Connecticut, session 2026, SB00236.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. Section 13b-46 of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(a) The executive director may approve airports, heliports, vertiports,
restricted landing areas and other air navigation facilities. Any
municipality or person acquiring property for the purpose of
constructing or establishing an airport, heliport, vertiport or restricted
landing area shall, prior to such acquisition, apply to the executive
director for a certificate of approval of the site selected and the general
purpose or purposes for which the property is to be acquired, to ensure
that the property and its use shall conform to minimum standards of
safety and shall serve the public interest. Any proposed airport,
heliport, vertiport, restricted landing area or other air navigation facility
at which more than thirty-six landings and takeoffs are expected to be
made by aircraft in any year shall be approved by the executive director
before it shall be licensed to be used or operated. The executive director
shall make no charge for approval certificates of proposed property
acquisition for airport, heliport, vertiport or restricted landing area
LCO 1 of 4

Substitute Bill No. 236
purposes.
(b) The executive director may (1) license [airports, heliports,
vertiports, restricted landing areas and other air navigation facilities]
any airport, heliport, vertiport, restricted landing area and other air
navigation facility at which more than thirty-six landings and takeoffs
are expected to be made by aircraft in any year, and (2) renew such
licenses. When a certificate of approval of an airport, heliport, vertiport,
[or] restricted landing area or other air navigation facility has been
issued by the executive director, the executive director may grant a
license for operation and use. On and after [July 1, 1995] October 1, 2026,
the executive director shall charge a fee of [one hundred fifty] three
hundred dollars for each license or renewal thereof. Each such license
shall be effective for a period of three years from the date of issuance.
Each licensee shall certify, on a form provided by the executive director,
that the licensed facility shall comply with all applicable federal, state
and local laws and regulations during the license period. Municipalities
shall be exempt from the payment of any license fee in connection with
airports owned or operated by such municipalities.
(c) The executive director may (1) register any airport, heliport,
vertiport, restricted landing area or other air navigation facility at which
thirty-six or fewer landings and takeoffs are expected to be made by
aircraft in any year, and (2) renew such registrations. On and after
October 1, 2026, the executive director shall charge a fee of one hundred
dollars for each registration or renewal thereof. Each such registration
shall be effective for a period of three years from the date of issuance.
Each registrant shall certify, on a form provided by the executive
director, (A) that the registered facility shall comply with all applicable
federal, state and local laws and regulations during the registration
period, and (B) that there will be thirty-six or fewer landings and
takeoffs by aircraft at such facility in any year during the registration
period. Any airport, heliport, vertiport, restricted landing area or other
air navigation facility at which thirty-six or fewer landings and takeoffs
are expected to be made by aircraft in any year shall be registered with
the executive director pursuant to this subsection before it is to be used
LCO 2 of 4

Substitute Bill No. 236
or operated. Municipalities shall be exempt from the payment of any
registration fee in connection with airports owned or operated by such
municipalities.
[(c)] (d) No municipality or officer or employee thereof and no person
shall operate an airport, heliport, vertiport, restricted landing area or
other air navigation facility for which approval has not been granted,
and a license has not been issued, by the executive director in
accordance with the provisions of subsection (b) of this section or
registration has not been issued by the executive director in accordance
with the provisions of subsection (c) of this section. The provisions of
this section shall not apply to any airport, heliport, vertiport, restricted
landing area or other air navigation facility owned by the federal
government within this state. Any person who violates the provisions
of this subsection shall be guilty of a class C misdemeanor.
[(d)] (e) Any heliport in operation prior to October 1, 1985, shall be
deemed licensed for operation and use and the executive director shall
issue an original license for any such heliport upon the written request
of the person who controls and operates such heliport. Such heliports
shall be subject to the provisions of this chapter concerning the renewal
or revocation of licenses, inspection and review of air navigation
facilities and any other provision of this chapter except those concerning
the initial approval or licensing of such facilities. Such heliports shall be
subject to any rule or procedure adopted by the authority in accordance
with the provisions of this chapter except those concerning the initial
approval or licensing of any air navigation facility.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2026 13b-46
Statement of Legislative Commissioners:
In Subsec. (b), "airports, heliports, vertiports, restricted landing areas
and other air navigation facilities" was changed to the singular for
consistency, and in Subsec. (d), "was not made" was changed to "has not
LCO 3 of 4

Substitute Bill No. 236
been issued by the executive director" for clarity and "the provisions of"
was inserted after "violates" for consistency with standard drafting
conventions.
TRA Joint Favorable Subst.
LCO 4 of 4